Montana, session 2025, SB545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Danny L. Radish highway. (1) There is established the Danny L. Radish highway on
highway 37 from mile marker 63.6 to mile marker 66.8 in Lincoln County.
(2) The department shall design and install appropriate signs marking the location of the Danny L.
Radish highway.
(3) Maps that identify roadways in the state must be updated to include the location of the Danny
L. Radish highway when the department updates and publishes the state maps.
"61-3-406. Fees for personalized plates -- disposition. (1) In addition to all other fees and taxes
imposed by law, the applicant for a personalized license plate shall pay a fee of $25 for the original
personalized license plate and a fee of $10 for each transfer or renewal of the personalized license plate.
(2) The revenue derived from the fee must be deposited in the state general fund."
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
60, chapter 1, part 2, and the provisions of Title 60, chapter 1, part 2, apply to [section 1].
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 545
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 545, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 545
INTRODUCED BY M. CUFFE
AN ACT ESTABLISHING THE DANNY L. RADISH HIGHWAY IN LINCOLN COUNTY; DIRECTING THE
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION TO INSTALL SIGNS AT THE LOCATION AND TO INCLUDE THE
HIGHWAY ON THE NEXT PUBLICATION OF THE STATE HIGHWAY MAP; AMENDING SECTION 61-3-406,
MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”